New Jersey, session 221, A5137.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  As used in this act: Commissioner means the Commissioner of Health. Department means the Department of Health. Direct care worker means a direct support professional, certified homemaker-home health aide, or certified nurse aide. Program means the Direct Care Worker Support Program established pursuant to this act. 2.  a.  There is established in the Department of Health the Direct Care Worker Support Program.  The purpose of the program shall be to provide support to direct care workers by assisting direct care workers with childcare and transportation expenses and by examining wage gaps between different types of direct care workers. b.  The program shall provide financial assistance to direct care workers to assist with the cost of childcare and transportation expenses, in accordance with any requirements established by the department to implement the program. c.  The commissioner shall adopt eligibility criteria for providing financial assistance to individuals under the program.  A direct care worker who wishes to receive financial assistance from the program shall submit an application in a form and manner to be determined by the commissioner. 3.  The Department of Health shall conduct a study examining the wages of direct care workers and any wage gaps that exist between different types of direct care workers, and shall prepare and submit a written report, within one year of the effective date of this act, to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature, which shall include, but not be limited to, a summary of the departments findings and any of the departments recommendations for administrative or legislative action concerning direct care worker wages, including any recommendations or strategies to increase direct care worker wages or to promote fair compensation and support for direct care workers. 4.  There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Health such sums as are necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. 5.  The Commissioner of Health may adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 6.  This act shall take effect immediately.